Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1429.07
Electronic nicotine delivery system; restrictions on packaging and advertising.

A person holding a license under sections 28-1420 to 28-1429 shall not market, advertise, sell, or cause to be sold an electronic nicotine delivery system if the system's container, packaging, or advertising:

(1) Depicts a cartoon-like fictional character that mimics a character primarily aimed at entertaining minors;

(2) Imitates or mimics trademarks or trade dress of products that are or have been primarily marketed to minors;

(3) Includes a symbol that is primarily used to market products to minors;

(4) Includes an image of a celebrity; or

(5) Is designed to disguise the fact that it is an electronic nicotine delivery system.

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 18.